Utah statutes.
62A-4a-608.   Choose Life Adoption Support Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund the "Choose Life Adoption Support Restricted Account."

(2)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the Choose Life Adoption Support Restricted Account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;

(b)  appropriations to the account by the Legislature;

(c)  private contributions; and

(d)  donations or grants from public or private entities.

(3)  The Legislature shall appropriate money in the account to the division.

(4)  The division shall distribute the funds in the account to one or more charitable organizations that:

(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  have as part of their primary mission the support, promotion, and education of adoption programs; and

(c)  are licensed or registered to do business within the state in accordance with state law.

(5) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (4) may apply to the division to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (4).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the division in accordance with Subsection (4) shall expend the distribution only to:

(i)  produce and distribute educational and promotional materials on adoption;

(ii)  conduct educational courses on adoption; and

(iii)  provide other programs that support adoption.

(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules providing procedures and requirements for an organization to apply to the division to receive a distribution under Subsection (4).



Enacted by Chapter 438, 2011 General Session

